Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 15. Starting and Turning; Signaling.

§ 63-3-701.
Starting of stopped, standing, or parked vehicle.

No person shall start a vehicle which is stopped, standing, or parked unless and until such movement can be made with reasonable safety.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8191; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-703.
Turning at intersections.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn at an intersection shall do so as follows:

Both the approach for a right turn and the turn itself shall be made as close as practical to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

The approach for a left turn shall be made in that portion of the right half of the roadway nearest the center line thereof and after entering the intersection the left turn shall be made so as to leave the intersection to the right of the center line of the roadway being entered.

The approach for a left turn from a two-way street into a one-way street shall be made in that portion of the right half of the roadway nearest the center line thereof and by passing to the right of such center line where it enters the intersection. A left turn from a one-way street into a two-way street shall be made by passing to the right of the center line of the street being entered upon leaving the intersection.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may cause markers, buttons, or signs to be placed within or adjacent to intersections and thereby require and direct that a different course from that specified in this section be traveled by vehicles turning at an intersection. When markers, buttons, or signs are so placed no driver of a vehicle shall turn a vehicle at an intersection other than as directed and required by such markers, buttons, or signs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8189; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-705.
Turning on curves or crests of grades.

No vehicle shall be turned so as to proceed in the opposite direction upon any curve, or upon the approach to or near the crest of the grade, where such vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction within five hundred feet.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8190; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-707.
Requirements as to signalling of turns or stops.

No person shall turn a vehicle from a direct course upon a highway unless and until such movement can be made with reasonable safety and then only after giving a clearly audible signal by sounding the horn if any pedestrian may be affected by such movement or after giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided in this article in the event any other vehicle may be affected by such movement.

A signal of intention to turn right or left shall be given continuously for a reasonable distance before turning.

No person shall stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided in this article to the driver of any vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give such signal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8192; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-709.
Manner of signalling generally.

The signals required in this article shall be given either by means of the hand and arm or by a signal lamp or signal device of a type approved by the department. When a vehicle is so constructed or loaded that a hand and arm signal would not be visible both to the front and rear of such vehicle, then said signals must be given by such a lamp or device.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8193; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-711.
Hand and arm signals.

All signals given by hand and arm shall be given from the left side of the vehicle in the following manner and such signals shall indicate as follows:

1. Left turn-hand and arm extended horizontally.

2. Right turn-hand and arm extended upward or moved with a sweeping motion from the rear to the front.

3. Stop or decrease speed-hand and arm extended downward.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8194; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.